California, session 20252026, AB1562.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12325 is added to the Elections Code, to read:12325. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for each election, a county may adopt a system in which individuals are randomly selected to serve as precinct board members.(2) The elections official may develop and propose a plan for the random selection of precinct board members at the election. The plan shall be implemented only if it is approved by the county board of supervisors.(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), every registered voter who resides in the jurisdiction is eligible to be selected to serve as a precinct board member pursuant to this section.(2) A candidate for an office to be voted on at the election is not eligible to serve as a precinct board member pursuant to this section.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the elections official may disqualify a person who has been selected to serve as a precinct board member if the elections official, in their discretion, deems the person unsuitable to serve.(2) An eligible person shall not be excluded from service as a precinct board member pursuant to this section on the basis of any characteristic identified in Section 11135 of the Government Code.(d) (1) (A) An eligible person may be excused from service as a precinct board member pursuant to this section for ill health or another good and sufficient reason, as determined by the elections official.(B) An eligible person who is 70 years of age or older may request to be excused from service as a precinct board member pursuant to this section.(2) An elections official who administers a system for random selection of precinct board members pursuant to this section shall develop a form that a person who is selected may use to request to be excused from service pursuant to paragraph (1). The form shall be publicly available on the elections official’s internet website.(e) (1) An elections official shall provide written notice to each person selected as a precinct board member pursuant to this section. The notice shall be mailed at least 15 days before the reporting date designated by the elections official for each election.(2) On the reporting date designated in the notice, each person selected to serve as a precinct board member shall report to the office of the elections official or another location designated by the elections official to complete any informational forms and receive training regarding their duties. The training shall include any instruction deemed necessary by the elections official.(3) Each person selected pursuant to this section shall serve for the duration of the election for which they are selected, unless they are excused pursuant to subdivision (d).(f) The elections official shall assign the individuals selected pursuant to this section to precincts within the jurisdiction in which the election will occur. The assigned individuals shall constitute the precinct board for that precinct.(g) (1) A precinct board member selected pursuant to this section shall receive compensation pursuant to Section 12310.(2) Section 12945.8 of the Government Code applies to an employee who serves as a precinct board member pursuant to this section in the same manner as that section applies to an employee who takes time off to serve on a jury.(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.